Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Part 1

General Provisions

65-1-101. Creation — Commissioners — Qualifications — Appointments — Vacancies — Term of office.

There is created the Tennessee public utility commission consisting of five (5) part-time commissioners. The commissioners shall be appointed as follows: one (1) commissioner shall be appointed by the governor, one (1) commissioner shall be appointed by the speaker of the senate, one (1) commissioner shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, and two (2) commissioners shall be appointed by joint agreement among the governor, the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives. In making the appointments pursuant to this subsection (a), the governor, the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives shall strive to ensure that the Tennessee public utility commission is composed of commissioners who are diverse in professional or educational background, ethnicity, geographic residency, perspective and experience.

Each commissioner of the commission shall have at a minimum a bachelor's degree and at least three (3) years' experience in a regulated utility industry, in executive level management, or in one (1) or more of the following fields:

Economics;

Law;

Finance;

Accounting; or

Engineering.

The commissioners of the commission shall be state officers and, except for the staggered terms provided in subsection (h), shall serve six-year terms.

The governor, the speaker of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives shall make appointments by April 1, prior to the expiration of the terms of office of the commissioners.

The term of office of each commissioner shall commence on July 1, following such commissioner's appointment.

All appointments of the commissioners shall be confirmed by joint resolution adopted by each house of the general assembly within thirty (30) days after the appointment.

Any vacancy on the commission shall be filled by the original appointing authority for such position to serve the unexpired term and each appointment shall be confirmed in the same manner as the original appointment. If, however, the general assembly is not in session and a vacancy occurs, the appropriate appointing authority shall fill such vacancy by appointment and the appointee shall serve the unexpired term, unless the appointment is not confirmed within thirty (30) days after the general assembly convenes following the appointment to fill such vacancy.

The terms of current commissioners appointed during 2008 and commissioners appointed during 2012 shall be staggered and shall expire as follows:

The terms of the existing commissioners appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and the speaker of the senate shall expire on June 30, 2014;

The term of the existing commissioner appointed by the governor shall expire on June 30, 2017;

The terms of the joint commissioners commencing on July 1, 2012, shall expire on June 30, 2018.

A commissioner shall continue to serve until the commissioner's successor is appointed.

Acts 1995, ch. 305, §§ 4, 5; 2002, ch. 826, § 3; T.C.A. § 65-1-201; Acts 2012, ch. 1070, § 1; 2017, ch. 94, §§ 45, 47.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee Public Utility Commission, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-242.

Former chapter, §§ 65-1-101 — 65-1-117 (Acts 1897, ch. 10, §§ 1-7, 27, 31; 1907, ch. 390, § 1; 1913, ch. 10, § 1;

Shan. §§ 3059a5-3059a11, 3059a13-3059a21, 3059a62, 3059a68; Acts 1919, ch. 3, § 19; 1919, ch. 49, §§ 1, 3; mod. Code 1932, §§ 5380-5386, 5388-5393, 5395, 5396, 5438, 5444; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 24, 29; Acts 1947, ch. 39, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1949, ch. 38, § 1; Acts 1949, ch. 196, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 5383; Acts 1953, ch. 183, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 69, § 1; 1955, ch. 105, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 193, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; Acts 1965, ch. 308, § 2; 1976, ch. 806, § 1 (124); 1979, ch. 230, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-101 — 65-104, 65-106 — 65-116, 65-118, 65-119, 65-121; Acts 1982, ch. 871, § 1; 1992, ch. 871, § 1; 1993, ch. 382, § 1; 1994, ch. 913, § 1) concerning the public service commission, was repealed by Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 5, effective July 1, 1996.

Former § 65-1-114 (Acts 1897, ch. 10, § 6; Shan., § 3059a19; Code 1932, § 5394; Acts 1979, ch. 230, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-117), concerning certified copies as evidence, was previously repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 273, § 35.

Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 4 provided that it is the intention of the general assembly that the evaluation committee reviewing the Tennessee regulatory authority pursuant to the Tennessee governmental entity review law consider the method of selection of the directors of such authority and report its recommendations on such selection process to the general assembly with its recommendations to continue, restructure or reestablish the Tennessee regulatory authority as a part of its normal review of the entity pursuant to § 4-29-223.

Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 6 provided that any duty or responsibility assigned to the public service commission pursuant to the provisions of this title, or any other provision of law which has not been transferred to an executive branch agency by the provisions of Acts 1995, ch. 305 is transferred to the Tennessee regulatory authority.

Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 7 provided that all rules of the public service commission in effect on May 26, 1995, shall remain in full force and effect as rules of the Tennessee regulatory authority and as rules of the appropriate departments until modified or repealed by the authority or appropriate department.

Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 11 provided:

“In order to carry out its functions, duties and responsibilities maintained under the provisions of this act, the public service commission shall retain and have the authority to exercise any and all of its powers and duties existing under Title 65 prior to enactment of this act, including, but not limited to, the power to subpoena, the power to take evidence, and the power to examine. Upon the termination of the public service commission, the Tennessee regulatory authority is expressly granted the same powers and duties as set forth above for the public service commission in order to carry out its responsibilities established by the provisions of this act.”

Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 45 provided:

“(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon the effective date of this section [July 1, 1996], all remaining employees of the public service commission not transferred by Sections 44, 46, and 47 of this act charged with the responsibility of regulating and enforcing the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 65, and any other employees of the public service commission necessary to assist in such regulating and enforcing, shall be transferred to the Tennessee regulatory authority created by this act. (b) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, papers or other writings in the possession of the public service commission with respect to administering the provisions of Title 65, assigned to the Tennessee regulatory authority by this act, shall be transferred to and remain in the custody of the Tennessee regulatory authority. (c) All leases, contracts and all contract rights, and responsibilities in existence with the public service commission with respect to the duties transferred by this section shall be preserved and transferred to the Tennessee regulatory authority. (d) All assets, liabilities and obligations of the public service commission with respect to the duties transferred by this section shall become the assets, liabilities and obligations of the Tennessee regulatory authority. (e) Any revenues from rates, fares, charges, fines, and other moneys received pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 65, an assigned to the Tennessee regulatory authority by this act as approved by the transition team pursuant to Section 48, shall be allocated to the Tennessee regulatory authority to implement the provisions of this act. (f) The authority shall promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to Title 4, Chapter 5, to effectuate the purposes of this act.”

Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 54 provided that as sections, parts, titles, chapters and volumes of Tennessee Code Annotated are amended, repealed, revised and replaced, the Tennessee code commission is directed to change references to the public service commission to references to the Tennessee regulatory authority and/or to appropriate departments to which duties and responsibilities of the public service commission have been transferred by the provisions of Acts 1995, ch. 305. After the effective date of Acts 1995, ch. 305 (see individual sections), any reference to the public service commission shall be deemed to be a reference to the Tennessee regulatory authority or appropriate department as provided by the provisions of Acts 1995, ch. 305.

Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 136 provided that for the purposes of transition, references to the public service commission may be deemed to be references to the Tennessee regulatory authority, the department of transportation, the department of safety, and the comptroller of the treasury, and references to the Tennessee regulatory authority may be deemed to be references to the public service commission, to accommodate the transition plans developed pursuant to § 65-1-301 (now § 65-1-201).

Acts 2002, ch. 826, § 7 provided that confirmations of appointments made or begun prior to July 1, 2002, remain in full force and effect and appointments made pursuant to such confirmations shall remain valid appointments.

Section 65-1-305 was transferred to § 65-1-114 in 2004.

Former § 65-1-306 (Acts 1996, ch. 931, § 1), concerning waiver of competitive process for former public service commission employees, was repealed by Acts 1996, ch. 931, § 3, effective December 31, 1996.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” in the first sentence of (a); substituted “commission for “authority” and “commissioner” and “commissioners” for “director” and “directors” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Cross-References. Assessment of railroads and utilities for tax purposes, title 67, ch. 5, part 13.

Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Salaries of commissioners, § 8-23-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, §§ 49, 58; 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 2; 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Service Commissions, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Electricity — Original Jurisdiction of the Public Utility Commission, 14 Tenn. L. Rev. 639 (1937).

Attorney General Opinions. Transfer of functions of commission, OAG 95-043, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 42 (4/24/95).

If the Tennessee regulatory authority's current directors are not reappointed, and if there are no new appointments to the director positions, the current directors will continue to hold their offices and to exercise their powers and perform their duties until their successors are duly appointed and confirmed by the general assembly; if one of the current directors refuses to continue in office, thereby creating a vacancy, the appointing authority may fill the vacancy by appointment; if the general assembly is in session when the vacancy occurs, the new appointment must be confirmed in the same manner as the original appointment; and if the general assembly is not in session when the vacancy occurs, the appointee may serve until the general assembly reconvenes and votes on confirmation of the appointment, OAG 02-060, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 65 (5/7/02).

Amendments by Acts 2012, ch. 1070. OAG 12-71, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 71 (7/13/12).

65-1-102. Commissioners — Prohibited activities.

No commissioner shall hold any other public office, under either the government of the United States or the government of this or any other state, nor shall any commissioner, while acting as such, engage in any business or occupation inconsistent with such person's duties as a commissioner. No commissioner shall be eligible to qualify as a candidate for any elected office unless such commissioner resigns from the commission prior to qualifying as a candidate. For the purposes of this section, “qualify as a candidate” means filing a statement certifying the name and address of a political treasurer pursuant to § 2-10-105(e).

No person who owns, in an individual capacity or jointly with another person, any bonds, stocks, equity interest or other property in any business or entity regulated by the Tennessee public utility commission, or who is an agent or employee in any way of any such business or entity, shall be eligible to serve as a commissioner of the Tennessee public utility commission.

No commissioner shall raise funds or solicit contributions for any political candidate or political party, or, except as provided in subdivision (c)(2), actively campaign for any candidate for public office.

A commissioner shall be permitted to actively campaign for an “immediate family member” as that phrase is defined in § 8-50-502(8).

The mere attendance of a commissioner at a political event or politically oriented event shall not constitute a violation of subdivision (c)(1).

A commissioner's alleged violation of this subsection (c) shall be treated in the same manner as if such commissioner were a judge covered by Rule 10 of the Rules of the Supreme Court.

No commissioner shall enter into an employment relationship, a consulting or representation agreement, or other similar contract or agreement with either an entity regulated by the commission or a subcontractor of such an entity for a period of one (1) year after the commissioner ceases to serve as a commissioner of the commission.

Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 5; 1996, ch. 636, § 1; 2001, ch. 450, § 1; T.C.A. § 65-1-202; Acts 2013, ch. 245, § 2; 2017, ch. 94, §§ 45-47.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” in (b); substituted “commission” for “authority” and “commissioner” and “commissioners” for “director” and “directors” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-1-103. Meetings.

The commissioners shall convene regular monthly meetings and shall remain in session until all business before them is disposed of, and shall hold other sessions at such times and places as may be necessary for the proper discharge of their duties. If the business of the commission does not require a monthly meeting, a majority of the commissioners may waive the requirement of a meeting.

All decisions of the Tennessee public utility commission pertaining to dispositions to or from any deferred revenue account shall be made in a public meeting of the commission. The attorney general and reporter and any other interested party shall be given adequate notice of the meeting and shall be given the opportunity to present oral and written testimony. As used in this section, “deferred revenue account” means any account created for the excess earnings from utilities regulated by the Tennessee public utility commission.

Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 5; T.C.A. § 65-1-203; Acts 2012, ch. 1070, § 2; 2017, ch. 94, §§ 45-47.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commissioners” for “directors” twice in (a); substituted “the commission” for “the authority” in the second sentence of (a) and in the first sentence of (b); and substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee Regulatory Authority” twice in (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-1-104. Quorum — Chair and vice chair — Panels.

A majority of the commissioners of the Tennessee public utility commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The commission shall elect one (1) of its commissioners to be the chair of the commission for a two-year term and shall elect one (1) of its commissioners to be the vice chair of the commission for a two-year term. The vice chair shall assume the role of chair at the expiration of the chair's two-year term.

The chair and vice chair of the commission may be removed by a majority vote of the disinterested commissioners.

The chair shall have the primary responsibility of formulating the broad strategies, goals, objectives, long-range plans and policies of the commission, in conjunction with the commissioners. The chair shall also have the power and duty to conduct ordinary and necessary business in the name of the commission. Such duties include, but are not limited to, the following:

Giving notice of, and agendas for, all meetings of the commission to all commissioners in advance of the meeting;

Assigning matters to be heard by panels in accordance with this section;

Preparing and calling the docket items to be heard during each scheduled meeting of the commission;

Keeping the official, full and correct record of all proceedings and transactions of the commission;

Serving as the designated contact for all media inquiries to the commission;

Ensuring that orders by the commission are issued in a timely manner and in accordance with the rules and procedures established by the executive director;

Conducting a yearly performance evaluation of the executive director, which shall be submitted to the governor;

Delegating duties of the chair to the vice chair; and

Performing such other duties as the commission may assign or as may be required by statute, rule or regulation.

The chair shall assign each matter before the commission to a panel of three (3) voting members, from among the commissioners. The remaining two (2) voting members of the commission, who are not assigned to a particular panel, shall not vote or deliberate regarding such matters. The commission shall establish reasonable procedures for rotating the commissioners for assignments to panels in an efficient manner. Such procedures shall ensure that all voting members of the commission serve on a substantially equal number of panels in a random fashion, to the extent practicable.

Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 5; 2002, ch. 826, § 4; T.C.A. § 65-1-204; Acts 2012, ch. 1070, §§ 3-6; 2017, ch. 94, §§ 45-47.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2002, ch. 826, § 7 provided that confirmations of appointments made or begun prior to July 1, 2002, remain in full force and effect, and appointments made pursuant to such confirmations shall remain valid appointments.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commissioners” for “directors” throughout; substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee Regulatory Authority” in the first sentence of (a); and substituted “commission” for “authority” throughout.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, § 58.

Law Reviews.

An Examination of the Tennessee Law of Administrative Procedure (George Street Boone), 1 Vand. L. Rev. 339 (1947-1948).

Attorney General Opinions. Proposed amendment not within bill caption, OAG 99-073, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 73 (3/23/99).

65-1-105. Compensation — Expenses.

The compensation of each commissioner of the Tennessee public utility commission shall be thirty-six thousand dollars ($36,000) per year payable monthly out of the state treasury on the warrant of the commissioner of finance and administration. When commissioners are assigned to serve on a panel lasting more than one (1) day, the commissioner shall be compensated one hundred forty dollars ($140) for each day, or portion of a day, following the first day, for the duration of the matter. Such compensation shall be in addition to reimbursement for actual travel expenses on official business under subsection (b).

The five (5) commissioners shall be reimbursed for their actual travel expenses on official business in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 5; 2002, ch. 826, § 5; T.C.A. § 65-1-205; Acts 2012, ch. 1070, § 7; 2017, ch. 94, §§ 45, 47.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2002, ch. 826, § 7 provided that confirmations of appointments made or begun prior to July 1, 2002, remain in full force and effect, and appointments made pursuant to such confirmations shall remain valid appointments.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (a), substituted “each commissioner of the Tennessee public utility commission” for “each director of the Tennessee regulatory authority” in the first sentence, and substituted “When commissioners” for “When directors” and “the commissioner” for “the director” in the second sentence; and substituted “The five (5) commissioners” for “The five (5) directors” at the beginning of (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Collateral References.

Per diem compensation of railroad commissioners. 1 A.L.R. 296.

65-1-106. Travel reimbursement for employees subject to comprehensive travel regulations.

All employees of the Tennessee public utility commission shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 5; T.C.A. § 65-1-206; Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 45.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “the Tennessee public utility commission” for “the Tennessee regulatory authority”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-1-107. [Repealed.]

Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 5; T.C.A. § 65-1-207; Acts 2017, ch. 94, §§ 45, 47; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 98, § 1, effective March 28, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 65-1-107 concerned prohibition of gifts.

65-1-108. Office — Furniture and supplies.

The Tennessee public utility commission shall be furnished a permanent office in Nashville, with all necessary furniture, stationery, and supplies, to be paid for by the state.

Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 5; T.C.A. § 65-1-208; Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 45.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “The Tennessee public utility commission” for “The Tennessee regulatory authority” at the beginning.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-1-109. Executive director.

The executive director shall be appointed by joint agreement among the governor, the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives for the initial term. Thereafter, the commissioners of the commission shall appoint the executive director. The term of the executive director shall be three (3) years. The executive director shall have at a minimum a bachelor's degree and either a minimum of five (5) years' experience in the regulated utility industry or a minimum of five (5) years' experience in executive-level management, with a preference toward experience in economics, law, finance, accounting or engineering. The executive director shall not be a commissioner of the commission.

The commission may remove the executive director by a majority vote of the commissioners.

The executive director shall have the principal responsibility of implementing the broad strategies, goals, objectives, long-range plans and policies of the commission. Among the executive director's duties, which are not limited to the following list, are:

Serving as chief operating officer of the commission responsible for the day to day management of the commission and the supervision and hiring of all staff members within the limits of available funds authorized from time to time by the legislature;

Administering, monitoring, and reviewing the operating procedures of each division of the commission, ensuring that each employee and division of the commission fully executes in an efficient and economical manner, the separate duties assigned to each;

Submitting rules and policies for approval by the commission;

Implementing and administering rules and policies for the efficient and economical internal management of the commission;

Coordinating the preparation of the report to the general assembly as required by § 65-1-111;

Supervising the expenditure of funds and being responsible for complying with all applicable state and federal law in the receipt and disbursement of funds; and

Performing such other duties as the commission may require, from time to time, or as may be required by statute.

The governor shall set the compensation of the executive director for the initial term of office of the executive director, which shall not exceed the compensation established for the commissioners of the claims commission. Thereafter, the commissioners of the commission shall set the compensation of the executive director.

The executive director shall submit an annual report to the general assembly comparing telecommunications, electricity, natural gas, water and wastewater utility rates between Tennessee and the southeastern states. For the purpose of reporting rates in the report, the Tennessee public utility commission shall make comparisons on the basis of market choices made by consumers without regard to whether the services chosen are regulated or non-regulated services.

Acts 2012, ch. 1070, § 8; 2017, ch. 94, §§ 45, 46, 47, 80.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 65-1-109 (Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 5), concerning the duties of the executive secretary of the Tennessee regulatory authority, was repealed by Acts 2002, ch. 826, § 6, effective July 1, 2002.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” throughout the section and substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “TRA” in the last sentence of (e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-1-110. Minutes and official documents.

The minutes shall be signed by each member of the Tennessee public utility commission or by those present when any business is transacted. The minutes and all official documents of every kind shall be kept on file in the office of the commission.

Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 5; T.C.A. § 65-1-210; Acts 2017, ch. 94, §§ 45, 46.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” in the middle and substituted “commission” for “authority” at the end.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-1-111. Report to general assembly.

The Tennessee public utility commission shall, on the first Monday of February each year, make a report to the general assembly and to the governor of all matters relating to its office for the preceding year, and such as will disclose the practical workings of companies under its jurisdiction in this state, along with such suggestions as it may deem proper, together with an abstract of the minutes of all of its meetings.

[Deleted by 2016 amendment.]

Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 5; T.C.A. § 65-1-211; Acts 2012, ch. 1070, §§ 9, 10; 2016, ch. 797, § 18; 2017, ch. 94, § 45.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment deleted former (b) which read: “(b) The Tennessee regulatory authority shall prepare an annual report comparing, for the preceding fiscal year, the rates of municipal utilities, cooperatives, and utility districts providing water, gas or electricity to the rates of water, gas and electric utilities regulated by the authority. No later than October 1, 2012, and prior to October 1 of each subsequent year, the report shall be submitted to the governor, the speaker of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the members of the finance, ways and means committees of the senate and the house of representatives.”

The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” at the beginning of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 797, § 19. April 14, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Cross-References. Annual report, § 4-4-114.

Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, § 3-1-114.

65-1-112. Copies of records.

For a copy of any record on file in its office, the Tennessee public utility commission shall charge and receive the same fees that are charged by the secretary of state for similar services, and shall convey into the state treasury any amount so received.

Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 5; T.C.A. § 65-1-212; Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 45.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” near the middle of the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-1-113. Enforcement — Duties of authority.

It is the duty of the Tennessee public utility commission to ensure that Acts 1995, ch. 305 and all laws of this state over which they have jurisdiction are enforced and obeyed, that violations thereof are promptly prosecuted, and all penalties due the state are collected.

Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 5; T.C.A. § 65-1-213; Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 45.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 305, referred to in this section, enacted or amended numerous provisions throughout the code. See the Session Laws Disposition Table in Volume 13.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” near the beginning of the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-1-114. Former public service commission officers to retain service weapons.

A public service commission officer who is authorized to carry a firearm while on duty, and has more than twenty-five (25) years of honorable service, and leaves the service of the public service commission before retirement eligibility because of personnel actions executed under Acts 1995, ch. 305, may retain such employee's service weapon under § 65-15-106(c)(3).

Acts 1996, ch. 931, § 2; T.C.A. § 65-1-305.

Cross-References. Unlawful carrying or possession of a weapon, § 39-17-1307.

65-1-115. Members of former public service commission included in the executive service.

In addition to the designations of preferred and executive service employees in § 8-30-202, the following members of the former public service commission shall be included in the executive service:

Members of the Tennessee public utility commission;

The executive director of the Tennessee public utility commission;

The personal staff of the members of the Tennessee public utility commission;

The division commissioners and assistant division commissioners of the Tennessee public utility commission; and

Any attorneys employed by the Tennessee public utility commission.

All actions of the department of human resources in regard to the Tennessee public utility commission personnel transactions may, upon request of a majority of the commission's commissioners, be reviewed and revised, modified or reversed by action of the house finance, ways and means committee and the senate finance, ways and means committee.

Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 51; T.C.A. § 65-1-303; Acts 2017, ch. 94, §§ 45-47.

Compiler's Notes. In light of the passage of Acts 2012, ch. 800, which rewrote the civil service provisions, “preferred and executive employees in § 8-30-202” was substituted for “career and executive service employees in § 8-30-208” in the introductory paragraph.

The reference to the “department of personnel” was changed to the “department of human resources” pursuant to Acts 2007, ch. 60 § 3, effective April 24, 2007.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” five times in (a) and once in (b); substituted “commissioners” for “directors” twice in (a)(4); and substituted “commission's commissioners” for “authority's directors” near the middle of (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Cross-References. Retirement bonuses for commission employees, § 8-34-209.

65-1-116. Commissioners deemed state employees eligible for insurance benefits.

Tennessee public utility commission commissioners shall be deemed state employees as defined in § 8-27-201(g) [repealed and reenacted; see Compiler's Notes] and shall be eligible for participation in group insurance for state officials and employee plans as approved by the general assembly.

Acts 2012, ch. 1070, § 11; 2017, ch. 94, §§ 45, 47.

Compiler's Notes. Section 8-27-201 was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2015, ch. 426, effective May 18, 2015, and no longer defines “state employees.” See now § 8-27-204(a) for comparable provisions.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” at the beginning of the section and substituted “commissioners” for “directors” following “Tennessee public utility commission”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.